Hawaii, session 2025, SB1579.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that there is a statewide physician shortage.  According to the federal Health Resources and Services Administration, each county in the State contains a region that is a medically underserved area, as defined by the Public Health Service Act of 1944, P.L. 78-410. The legislature further finds that pharmacists can help bridge the gap created by the physician shortage.  A pharmacist's skill set upon obtaining a doctorate degree after four years of graduate level training includes an intimate understanding of chronic disease state treatment and prevention, medication management surrounding medication dosing, drug interactions and adverse effects, various medication utilization techniques, and culturally competent medication-related education skills. Additionally, pharmacists may complete up to two years of residency and obtain national board certifications and supplemental training in specialty areas. The legislature recognizes that pharmacists are the most accessible healthcare providers across the country, and often the only healthcare professionals available after business hours, outside of an emergency department.  Substantial literature clearly documents the proven and significant improvement to patient outcomes and reduction in health care expenditures when pharmacists are optimally leveraged as medication experts on patient care teams. The legislature notes that the expansion of programs that increase patient access to health care services provided by their pharmacist in Hawaii is aligned with the growing trend of similar programs in other states.  In states where a program has been implemented, health plans recognize the value of the pharmacist and invest in the services that they provide to capitalize on the positive therapeutic and economic outcomes associated with pharmacist-provided care. Given the unique health disparities across the islands, patient access to pharmacist-provided care can address health inequities while reducing hospital admissions, increasing medication adherence, and decreasing overall health expenditures by recognizing and covering the valuable health care services that pharmacists provide. Furthermore, the legislature finds it important to support locally independent pharmacies by allowing pharmacists to have a sustainable financial business model that includes reimbursement for services within a pharmacists scope of practice. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to mandate reimbursement for services provided by pharmacists within their scope of practice by private and public health plans in the State.  After introduction of this bill in 2023, a report [23-2] completed by the office of the auditor pursuant to Senate Concurrent Resolution No. 17 found that the proposed health insurance coverage does not extend coverage for additional health care services or diseases.  Per the report, the proposed insurance coverage for health care services performed by pharmacists would not result in any cost to the State, as the bill specifically limits the proposed coverage for health care services to the extent that the policy provides benefits for identical services rendered by another health care provider. SECTION 2. Chapter 431, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to article 10A to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§431:10A-     Services provided by participating registered pharmacists; coverage.  (a) Each individual or group policy of accident and health or sickness insurance delivered or issued for delivery in this State after July 1, 2026, shall include coverage for care provided by a participating registered pharmacist practicing within the scope of the pharmacist's license for purposes of health maintenance or treatment to the extent that the policy provides benefits for identical services rendered by another health care provider. (b)  For the purposes of this section, "participating registered pharmacist" means a pharmacist licensed pursuant to chapter 461 who has contracted with the insurer to provide health care services to its insureds." SECTION 3. Chapter 432, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to article 1 to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§432:1-     Services provided by participating registered pharmacists; coverage.  (a) Each individual or group hospital or medical service plan contract delivered or issued for delivery in this State after July 1, 2026, shall include coverage for care provided by a participating registered pharmacist practicing within the scope of the pharmacist's license for purposes of health maintenance or treatment to the extent that the plan contract provides benefits for identical services rendered by another health care provider. (b)  For the purposes of this section, "participating registered pharmacist" means a pharmacist licensed pursuant to chapter 461 who has contracted with the mutual benefit society to provide health care services to its members." SECTION 4. Section 346-53.64, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  Services eligible for prospective payment system reimbursement are those services that are furnished by a federally qualified health center or rural health clinic that are: (1)  Within the legal authority of a federally qualified health center to deliver, as defined in section 1905 of the Social Security Act; (2)  Actually provided by the federally qualified health center, either directly or under arrangements; (3)  Covered benefits under the medicaid program, as defined in section 4231 of the State Medicaid Manual and the Hawaii medicaid state plan; (4)  Provided to a recipient eligible for medicaid benefits; (5)  Delivered exclusively by health care professionals, including physicians, physician's assistants, nurse practitioners, pharmacists, nurse midwives, clinical social workers, clinical psychologists, and other persons acting within the lawful scope of their license or certificate to provide services; (6)  Provided at the federally qualified health center's practice site, a hospital emergency room, in an inpatient setting, at the patient's place of residence, including long term care facilities, or at another medical facility; and (7)  Within the scope of services provided by the State under its fee-for-service medicaid program and its medicaid managed care program, on and after August 1994, and as amended from time to time." SECTION 5. Section 346-59, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b) Rates of payment to providers of medical care who are individual practitioners, including doctors of medicine, dentists, podiatrists, psychologists, osteopaths, optometrists, pharmacists, and other individuals providing services, shall be based upon the Hawaii medicaid fee schedule.  The amounts paid shall not exceed the maximum permitted to be paid individual practitioners or other individuals under federal law and regulation, the medicare fee schedule for the current year, the state limits as provided in the appropriation act, or the provider's billed amount. The appropriation act shall indicate the percentage of the medicare fee schedule for the year 2000 to be used as the basis for establishing the Hawaii medicaid fee schedule.  For any subsequent adjustments to the fee schedule, the legislature shall specify the extent of the adjustment in the appropriation act." SECTION 6. Section 346-59.1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (g) to read as follows: "(g)  For the purposes of this section: "Distant site" means the location of the health care provider delivering services through telehealth at the time the services are provided. "Health care provider" means a provider of services, as defined in title 42 United States Code section 1395x(u), a provider of medical and other health services, as defined in title 42 United States Code section 1395x(s), other practitioners licensed by the State and working within their scope of practice, and any other person or organization who furnishes, bills, or is paid for health care in the normal course of business, including but not limited to primary care providers, mental health providers, oral health providers, physicians and osteopathic physicians licensed under chapter 453, advanced practice registered nurses licensed under chapter 457, psychologists licensed under chapter 465, pharmacists licensed under chapter 461, and dentists licensed under chapter 448. "Originating site" means the location where the patient is located, whether accompanied or not by a health care provider, at the time services are provided by a health care provider through telehealth, including but not limited to a health care provider's office, hospital, critical access hospital, rural health clinic, federally qualified health center, a patient's home, and other non-medical environments such as school-based health centers, university-based health centers, or the work location of a patient. "Telehealth" means the use of telecommunications services, as defined in section 269‑1, to encompass four modalities:  store and forward technologies, remote monitoring, live consultation, and mobile health; and which shall include but not be limited to real-time video conferencing-based communication, secure interactive and non‑interactive web-based communication, and secure asynchronous information exchange, to transmit patient medical information, including diagnostic-quality digital images and laboratory results for medical interpretation and diagnosis, for the purpose of delivering enhanced health care services and information while a patient is at an originating site and the health care provider is at a distant site.  Standard telephone contacts, facsimile transmissions, or e-mail text, in combination or by itself, does not constitute a telehealth service for the purposes of this section." SECTION 7. Section 432D-23, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§432D-23  Required provisions and benefits.  Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, each policy, contract, plan, or agreement issued in the State after January 1, 1995, by health maintenance organizations pursuant to this chapter, shall include benefits provided in sections 431:10-212, 431:10A-115, 431:10A-115.5, 431:10A-116, 431:10A‑116.2, 431:10A-116.5, 431:10A-116.6, 431:10A-119, 431:10A-120, 431:10A-121, 431:10A-122, 431:10A-125, 431:10A-126, 431:10A-132, 431:10A-133, 431:10A-134, 431:10A-140, and [431:10A-134,] 431:10A-  , and chapter 431M." SECTION 8. The department of human services shall apply to the United States Department of Health and Human Services for any amendment to the state Medicaid plan or for any Medicaid waiver necessary to implement sections 4, 5, and 6 of this Act.  The department shall submit the Medicaid state plan amendment no later than     . SECTION 9. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 10.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 11. This Act shall take effect upon its approval; provided that sections 4 through 6 of this Act shall take effect upon approval of the Hawaii medicaid state plan by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________